Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REGIONAL DEMONSTRATION PROJECT TO TREAT LANDFILL LEACHATE.new text end new text begin $5,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to Lyon County to protect groundwater from contamination by constructing a regional demonstration project at the Lyon County Regional Landfill to treat landfill leachate for perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), chloride, and other potential contaminants. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end